Utah statutes.
53-16-302.   Department rulemaking authority.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules consistent with Section 53-16-301 prescribing information that a law enforcement agency shall include with an application under Section 53-16-301.

